Washington statutes.
RCW 35.53.050

Termination of trust in certain property—Complaint—Allegations.

The complaint in any such action by a city or town to terminate its trust in property acquired at a local improvement assessment sale shall set forth:

(1) The number of the local improvement district or utility local improvement district,

(2) The bonds and warrants owing thereby,

(3) The owners thereof or that the owners are unknown,

(4) A description of the assets of the district with the estimated value thereof,

(5) The amount of the assessments, including penalty and interest, of any other local improvement districts or utility local improvement districts which are a lien upon the same property,

(6) The amount of the bonds and warrants owing by such other districts and the names of the owners thereof unless they are unknown, except where the bonds and warrants are guaranteed by a local improvement guaranty fund or pursuant to any other form of guaranty authorized by law.

[ 1967 c 52 s 22; 1965 c 7 s 35.53.050. Prior: 1929 c 142 s 1, part; RRS s 9384-1, part.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.